Utah statutes.
53A-3-411.   Employment of school personnel -- Length of contract -- Termination for cause -- Individual contract of employment -- Employee acknowledgment of liability protection.

(1)  A local school board may enter into a written employment contract for a term not to exceed five years.

(2)  Nothing in the terms of the contract shall restrict the power of a local school board to terminate the contract for cause at any time.

(3) (a)  A local school board may not enter into a collective bargaining agreement that prohibits or limits individual contracts of employment.

(b)  Subsection (3)(a) does not apply to an agreement that was entered into before May 5, 2003.

(4)  Each local school board shall:

(a)  ensure that each employment contract complies with the requirements of Section 34-32-1.1;

(b)  comply with the requirements of Section 34-32-1.1 in employing any personnel, whether by employment contract or otherwise; and

(c)  ensure that at the time an employee enters into an employment contract, the  employee shall sign a separate document acknowledging that the employee:

(i)  has received:

(A)  the disclosure required under Subsection 63A-4-204(4)(d) if the school district participates in the Risk Management Fund; or

(B)  written disclosure similar to the disclosure required under Section 63A-4-204 if the school district does not participate in the Risk Management Fund; and

(ii)  understands the legal liability protection provided to the employee and what is not covered, as explained in the disclosure.



Amended by Chapter 285, 2005 General Session

